District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.03

Targeted services.

Targeted services shall consist of those tasks that the Mayor has determined will foster the independence, self-sufficiency, and noninstitutionalized living of eligible persons and shall fall within the following categories:

(1)

Those tasks, such as respite care, personal grooming, and meal preparation, that, when performed in the home, address the personal care needs of an eligible person;

(2)

Those tasks, such as light housekeeping, heavy cleaning, and minor repairs, that, when performed in or around the home, address the environmental needs of an eligible person;

(3)

Those tasks, such as exercise and recreational therapy, that address the physical or rehabilitative needs of an eligible person; and

(4)

Those tasks, such as transportation and escort, that address the ability of an eligible person to function outside the home.

History

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 4, 33 DCR 4372

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2243.